Colorado, session 2026A, HB1180.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-21-116, repeal
(2)(a) and (4) as follows:
24-21-116. Business intelligence center program - creation -
public data - contests - legislative declaration - definitions.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Advisory board" means the business intelligence center
advisory board created in paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(4) (a) The business intelligence center advisory board is created in
the department to assist the department in the operation of the program.
(b) The advisory board consists of:
(I) The secretary of state or his or her designee;
(II) A representative from the governor's office;
(III) A representative from the Colorado office of economic
development created in section 24-48.5-101;
(IV) A representative from the office of information technology
created in section 24-37.5-103;
(V) A representative from the statewide internet portal authority
created in section 24-37.7-102; and
(VI) Up to six additional representatives whom the secretary of state
appoints from state or local government, the private sector, or the nonprofit
community. The secretary of state or his or her designee may also invite
additional representatives to attend board meetings and participate as
non-voting members.
(c) The secretary of state or his or her designee shall chair the board.
The board shall meet at the chairperson's discretion. Members of the
advisory board serve without compensation and without reimbursement for
expenses.
(d) This subsection (4) is repealed, effective September 1, 2026.
Prior to such repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall review the
advisory board as provided in section 2-3-1203, C.R.S.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1203, repeal
(17)(a)(II) as follows:
2-3-1203. Sunset review of advisory committees - legislative
declaration - definition - repeal.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1180

(17) (a) The following statutory authorizations for the designated
advisory committees will repeal on September 1, 2026:
(II) The business intelligence center advisory panel created in
section 24-21-116 (4)(a), C.R.S.;
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1180

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1180